New York, session 2025-2026, S561.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 26-605.2 to read as follows: 3 § 26-605.2 Required notice. (a) A tenant residing in a dwelling unit 4 subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be furnished a notice 5 informing such tenant about the tenant's potential eligibility for a 6 rent increase exemption pursuant to this chapter and sections four 7 hundred sixty-seven-b and four hundred sixty-seven-c of the the real 8 property tax law. The form and content of such notice shall be promul- 9 gated as required by paragraph i of subdivision three of section four 10 hundred sixty-seven-b of the real property tax law, provided that such 11 notice shall clearly and conspicuously display the eligibility require- 12 ments for the rent increase exemption and the website address and tele- 13 phone number where tenants may obtain more information. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01748-05-5 S. 561--A 2 1 (b) The notice required by subdivision (a) of this section shall be 2 furnished by the following agencies or individuals at the same time as 3 the notice required by the occurrence of the following events: 4 (1) The state commissioner of housing and community renewal shall 5 provide such notice to a tenant in the event of: 6 (i) Receipt of an application for a rent adjustment due to a major 7 capital improvement; 8 (ii) A rent increase pursuant to section thirty-one of the private 9 housing finance law; 10 (iii) Receipt of the annual certification required by section thirty- 11 one of the private housing finance law; and 12 (iv) For dwelling units subject to chapter three of this title, a 13 maximum base rent adjustment pursuant to paragraph one of subdivision g 14 of section 26-405 of this title. 15 (2) The landlord of a dwelling unit shall provide such notice to a 16 tenant: 17 (i) With an initial lease and any renewal lease; and 18 (ii) Upon the annual registration of a housing accommodation as 19 required by section 26-517 of this title. 20 (c) When notice is furnished pursuant to paragraph one of subdivision 21 (b) of this section, such notice shall include specific information as 22 to the agency providing such notice. 23 § 2. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph i of subdivision 3 of section 467-b 24 of the real property tax law, as added by chapter 424 of the laws of 25 2015, is amended to read as follows: 26 (2) (A) a landlord of any housing accommodation subject to provisions 27 of the local emergency housing rent control act, the emergency tenant 28 protection act of nineteen seventy-four or any local laws enacted pursu- 29 ant thereto, the emergency housing rent control law or the rent stabili- 30 zation law of nineteen hundred sixty-nine shall, at least once annually, 31 including with a new lease and all renewal leases and upon the annual 32 registration of a housing accommodation as required by section 26-517 of 33 the administrative code of the city of New York delivered to the occu- 34 pant of such accommodation, provide the informational material describ- 35 ing eligibility for and the benefits of the senior citizen rent increase 36 exemption program and the disability rent increase exemption program, as 37 provided by the entity administering the program pursuant to subpara- 38 graph one of this paragraph. 39 (B) The notice required by clause (A) of this subparagraph shall be 40 furnished by the state commissioner of housing and community renewal to 41 a tenant at the same time as: 42 (i) Receipt of an application for a rent adjustment due to a major 43 capital improvement; 44 (ii) A rent increase pursuant to section thirty-one of the private 45 housing finance law; 46 (iii) Receipt of the annual certification required by section thirty- 47 one of the private housing finance law; and 48 (iv) For dwelling units subject to chapter three of title twenty-six 49 of the administrative code of the city of New York, a maximum base rent 50 adjustment pursuant to paragraph one of subdivision g of section 26-405 51 of the administrative code of the city of New York. 52 (C) When notice is furnished pursuant to clause (B) of this subpara- 53 graph, such notice shall include specific information as to the agency 54 providing such notice. 55 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 467-c of the real property tax law is 56 amended by adding a new paragraph e to read as follows: S. 561--A 3 1 e. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a tenant 2 residing in a dwelling unit subject to the provisions of this section 3 shall be furnished a notice informing such tenant about the tenant's 4 potential eligibility for a rent increase exemption pursuant to this 5 section. The form and content of such notice shall be promulgated as 6 required by paragraph i of subdivision three of section four hundred 7 sixty-seven-b of this title. 8 (2) The notice required by subparagraph one of this paragraph shall be 9 furnished by the following agencies or individuals at the same time as 10 the notice required by the occurrence of the following events: 11 (A) The state commissioner of housing and community renewal shall 12 provide such notice to a tenant in the event of: 13 (i) Receipt of an application for a rent adjustment due to a major 14 capital improvement; 15 (ii) A rent increase pursuant to section thirty-one of the private 16 housing finance law; 17 (iii) Receipt of the annual certification required by section thirty- 18 one of the private housing finance law; and 19 (iv) For dwelling units subject to chapter three of title twenty-six 20 of the administrative code of the city of New York, a maximum base rent 21 adjustment pursuant to paragraph one of subdivision g of section 26-405 22 of the administrative code of the city of New York. 23 (B) The landlord of a dwelling unit shall provide such notice to a 24 tenant: 25 (i) With an initial lease and any renewal lease; and 26 (ii) Upon the annual registration of a housing accommodation as 27 required by section 26-517 of the administrative code of the city of New 28 York. 29 (3) When notice is furnished pursuant to clause (A) of subparagraph 30 two of this paragraph, such notice shall include specific information as 31 to the agency providing such notice. 32 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 33 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 34 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 35 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 36 completed on or before such effective date.